Massachusetts, session 194th, H2916.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 32 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 12B the
following section:-
Section 12C. Notwithstanding section 12, if a former member of the uniformed division
of the state police who is a member inactive as a result of their retirement dies and leaves a
spouse to whom such member has been married for at least 1 year and with whom such member
was living at the time of the death of such member, or who the board finds had been living apart
from said member for justifiable cause other than desertion or moral turpitude on the part of such
spouse who is eligible to receive a member-survivor allowance under the provisions of option (d)
subdivision (2) of section 12, such surviving spouse shall receive a lifetime, monthly allowance
equal to the amount they would receive if the deceased member had, upon retirement, elected
of 2

option (c) of said subdivision (2) of said section 12 and nominated their spouse as their sole
surviving eligible beneficiary; provided, however, that the retirement board shall withhold from
each payment made to such surviving spouse during the first year of such payments, such an
amount, in equal increments, as is necessary to account for the difference in the total amount the
deceased member received pursuant to whichever option they elected at the time of their
retirement from the date of their retirement to the date of their death and the total amount they
would have received had they elected said option (c) from the date of their retirement. Any
retirement benefit provided to a surviving spouse pursuant to this paragraph shall be in lieu of,
and not in addition to, any benefits they may have otherwise received from the state retirement
board as the deceased member’s beneficiary.
of 2